Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1683.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Master Sergeant Robert F. Johnson Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Robert F. "Bobby" Johnson was born July 21, 1929.(2) Master Sergeant Johnson was the son of George S. and Alice Knarr Johnson.(3) Master Sergeant Johnson was a veteran of the United States Air Force, enlisting in 1947 and retiring in 1969 as a Master Sergeant.(4) Master Sergeant Johnson was initially assigned to an Air Police squadron during the Berlin Airlift and subsequently applied for pararescue training and spent the next 20 years as a rescue parachutist and diver assigned to 12345678910111213141516171819 the Aerospace Rescue and Recovery Service.(5) Master Sergeant Johnson made more than 350 parachute jumps during his career and participated in rescue operations in Africa, the Middle East, Asia and the United States.(6) Master Sergeant Johnson was assigned to support NASA's Mercury and Gemini spaceflight programs, parachuting and diving to recover NASA equipment and space capsules.(7) When the Gemini III space capsule splashed down into the Atlantic Ocean on March 23, 1965, bringing astronauts Virgil "Gus" Grissom and John Young safely back to Earth, Master Sergeant Johnson was the first diver to reach the capsule.(8) Master Sergeant Johnson's awards and qualifications included the Master Parachutist and Enlisted Aircrew Badges, Dive Badge, Air Force Commendation Medal, Air Force Outstanding Unit Award and Good Conduct Medal.(9) Master Sergeant Johnson was a Life Member of the Wayne Township Fire Department and involved in many other organizations.(10) Robert F. Johnson passed away at his home in Youngdale on February 2, 2022, at the age of 92.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 12334, carrying State Route 2012 over McElhattan Creek in Wayne Township, Clinton County, is designated as the Master Sergeant Robert F. Johnson Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1683PN2062 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930